Utah statutes.
39-1-4.   Staff of commander in chief.

(1)  The staff of the commander in chief shall consist of the adjutant general, the deputy commander of the joint forces headquarters, assistant adjutant general for army and the assistant adjutant general for air and any other members chosen from the officers of the Utah National Guard or active officers of the United States Armed Forces detailed on duty with the militia of the state.

(2)  The adjutant general and one other general officer shall serve with pay from the state.



Amended by Chapter 65, 2005 General Session

